District of Columbia statutes.
2-356.04

Architectural and engineering services.

(a)

The District shall announce all requirements for architectural and engineering services and negotiate contracts for these services on the basis of demonstrated competence and qualification and at fair and reasonable prices.

(b)

In the procurement of architectural and engineering services, the CPO shall:

(1)

Provide notice to firms to submit annually a statement of qualifications and performance data;

(2)

Appoint one or more permanent or ad hoc architect-engineer evaluation boards, comprised of members with experience in architecture, engineering, construction, and District and related procurement matters.

(c)

These boards shall include highly qualified professional employees of the District and may include private practitioners of architecture, engineering, or related professions. The members of a permanent or an ad hoc evaluation board shall be known as the architect-engineer selection committee.

(d)

For each architectural and engineering services contract over $100,000, the CPO shall appoint an architect-engineer selection committee. The selection committee for architectural and engineering services contracts under this amount shall be established in accordance with rules promulgated by the CPO. The selection committee shall evaluate current statements of qualifications and performance data on file with the District and those that may be submitted by other firms regarding the proposed contract. The selection committee shall conduct discussions with no less than 3 firms regarding the contract and the relative utility of alternative methods of approach for furnishing the required services, and then shall select therefrom, in order of preference, based upon criteria established and published by the selection committee, no less than 3 of the firms considered to be the most highly qualified to provide the services required.

(e)

The contracting officer shall negotiate a contract with the highest qualified firm for architectural and engineering services at compensation which the contracting officer determines in writing to be fair and reasonable to the District. The contracting officer shall take into account the estimated value, the scope, the complexity, and the professional nature of the services to be rendered. A contracting officer shall proceed as follows:

(1)

If the contracting officer is unable to negotiate a satisfactory contract with the firm considered to be the most qualified, negotiations with that firm shall be terminated and the contracting officer shall then undertake negotiations with the 2nd most qualified firm.

(2)

If the contracting officer is unable to negotiate a satisfactory contract with the firm considered to be the 2nd most qualified firm, the contracting officer shall terminate negotiations and shall undertake negotiations with the 3rd most qualified firm.

(3)

If the contracting officer is unable to negotiate a satisfactory contract with the firm considered to be the 3rd most qualified firm, the contracting officer shall terminate negotiations.

(4)

If the contracting officer is unable to negotiate a contract with any of the selected firms, the contracting officer may select additional firms in order of their competence and qualifications and shall continue negotiations in accordance with this section until an agreement is reached.

Apr. 8, 2011, D.C. Law 18-371, § 604, 58 DCR 1185
This section is referenced in § 2-356.02.